Utah statutes.
10-2-125.   Incorporation of a town.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Assessed value," with respect to agricultural land, means the value at
which the land would be assessed without regard to a valuation for
agricultural use under Section 59-2-503.
(b)  "Financial feasibility study" means a study to determine:
(i)  the projected revenues for the proposed town during the first three years
after incorporation; and
(ii)  the projected costs, including overhead, that the proposed town will
incur in providing governmental services during the first three years after
incorporation.
(c)  "Municipal service" means a publicly provided service that is not
provided on a countywide basis.
(d)  "Nonurban" means having a residential density of less than one unit per
acre.
(2) (a) (i)  A contiguous area of a county not within a municipality, with a
population of at least 100 but less than 1,000, may incorporate as a town as
provided in this section.
(ii)  An area within a county of the first class is not contiguous for
purposes of Subsection (2)(a)(i) if:
(A)  the area includes a strip of land that connects geographically separate
areas; and
(B)  the distance between the geographically separate areas is greater than
the average width of the strip of land connecting the geographically separate
areas.
(b)  The population figure under Subsection (2)(a) shall be determined:
(i)  as of the date the incorporation petition is filed; and
(ii)  by the Utah Population Estimates Committee within 20 days after the
county clerk's certification under Subsection (6) of a petition filed under
Subsection (4).
(3) (a)  The process to incorporate an area as a town is initiated by filing a
request for a public hearing with the clerk of the county in which the area is
located.
(b)  Each request for a public hearing under Subsection (3)(a) shall:
(i)  be signed by the owners of at least five separate parcels of private real
property, each owned by a different owner, located within the area proposed to
be incorporated; and
(ii)  be accompanied by an accurate map or plat depicting the boundary of the
proposed town.
(c)  Within ten days after a request for a public hearing is filed under
Subsection (3)(a), the county clerk shall, with the assistance of other county
officers from whom the clerk requests assistance, determine whether the
petition complies with the requirements of Subsection (3)(b).
(d)  If the clerk determines that a request under Subsection (3)(a) fails to
comply with the requirements of Subsection (3)(b), the clerk shall reject the
request and deliver written notice of the rejection to the signers of the
request.
(e) (i)  If the clerk determines that a request under Subsection (3)(a)
complies with the requirements of Subsection (3)(b), the clerk shall:
(A)  schedule and arrange for a public hearing to be held:
(I) (Aa)  at a public facility located within the boundary of the proposed
town; or
(Bb)  if there is no public facility within the boundary of the proposed town,
at another nearby public facility or at the county seat; and
(II)  within 20 days after the clerk provides the last notice required under
Subsection (3)(e)(i)(B); and
(B)  subject to Subsection (3)(e)(ii), give notice of the public hearing on
the proposed incorporation by:
(I)  posting notice of the public hearing on the county's Internet website, if
the county has an Internet website; and
(II) (Aa) (Ii)  publishing notice of the public hearing at least once a week
for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the
proposed town; and
(IIii)  publishing notice of the public hearing in accordance with Section
45-1-101 for two weeks; or
(Bb)  in accordance with Subsection (3)(e)(i)(B)(II)(Aa)(Ii), if there is no
newspaper of general circulation within the proposed town, posting notice of
the public hearing in at least five conspicuous public places within the
proposed town.
(ii)  The posting of notice required under Subsection (3)(e)(i)(B)(I) and, if
applicable, Subsection (3)(e)(i)(B)(II)(Bb) and the first publishing of notice
required under Subsection (3)(e)(i)(B)(II)(Aa), if applicable, shall occur no
later than ten days after the clerk determines that a request complies with
the requirements of Subsection (3)(b).
(iii)  Each public hearing under Subsection (3)(e)(i)(A) shall be conducted by
the chair of the county commission or council, or the chair's designee, to:
(A)  introduce the concept of the proposed incorporation to the public;
(B)  allow the public to review the map or plat of the boundary of the
proposed town;
(C)  allow the public to ask questions and become informed about the proposed
incorporation; and
(D)  allow the public to express their views about the proposed incorporation,
including their views about the boundary of the area proposed to be
incorporated.
(4) (a)  At any time within three months after the public hearing under
Subsection (3)(e), a petition to incorporate the area as a town may be filed
with the clerk of the county in which the area is located.
(b)  Each petition under Subsection (4)(a) shall:
(i)  be signed by:
(A)  the owners of private real property that:
(I)  is located within the area proposed to be incorporated;
(II)  covers a majority of the total private land area within the area;
(III)  is equal in assessed value to more than 1/2 of the assessed value of
all private real property within the area; and
(IV)  consists, in number of parcels, of at least 1/3 of the number of all
parcels of private real property within the area proposed to be incorporated;
and
(B)  a majority of all registered voters within the area proposed to be
incorporated as a town, according to the official voter registration list
maintained by the county on the date the petition is filed;
(ii)  designate as sponsors at least five of the property owners who have
signed the petition, one of whom shall be designated as the contact sponsor,
with the mailing address of each owner signing as a sponsor;
(iii)  be accompanied by and circulated with an accurate map or plat, prepared
by a licensed surveyor, showing a legal description of the boundary of the
proposed town; and
(iv)  substantially comply with and be circulated in the following form:
PETITION FOR INCORPORATION OF (insert the proposed name of the proposed town)
To the Honorable County Legislative Body of (insert the name of the county in
which the proposed town is located) County, Utah:
We, the undersigned owners of real property and registered voters within the
area described in this petition, respectfully petition the county legislative
body for the area described in this petition to be incorporated as a town.
Each of the undersigned affirms that each has personally signed this petition
and is an owner of real property or a registered voter residing within the
described area, and that the current residence address of each is correctly
written after the signer's name.  The area proposed to be incorporated as a
town is described as follows: (insert an accurate description of the area
proposed to be incorporated).
(c)  A petition under this Subsection (4) may not describe an area that
includes some or all of an area proposed for annexation in an annexation
petition under Section 10-2-403 that:
(i)  was filed before the filing of the petition; and
(ii)  is still pending on the date the petition is filed.
(d)  A petition may not be filed under this section if the private real
property owned by the petition sponsors, designated under Subsection
(4)(b)(ii), cumulatively exceeds 40% of the total private land area within the
area proposed to be incorporated as a town.
(e)  A signer of a petition under this Subsection (4) may withdraw or, after
withdrawn, reinstate the signer's signature on the petition:
(i)  at any time until the county clerk certifies the petition under
Subsection (6); and
(ii)  by filing a signed, written withdrawal or reinstatement with the county
clerk.
(5) (a)  If a petition is filed under Subsection (4)(a) proposing to
incorporate as a town an area located within a county of the first class, the
county clerk shall deliver written notice of the proposed incorporation:
(i)  to each owner of private real property owning more than 1% of the
assessed value of all private real property within the area proposed to be
incorporated as a town; and
(ii)  within seven calendar days after the date on which the petition is
filed.
(b)  A private real property owner described in Subsection (5)(a)(i) may
exclude all or part of the owner's property from the area proposed to be
incorporated as a town by filing a notice of exclusion:
(i)  with the county clerk; and
(ii)  within ten calendar days after receiving the clerk's notice under
Subsection (5)(a).
(c)  The county legislative body shall exclude from the area proposed to be
incorporated as a town the property identified in the notice of exclusion
under Subsection (5)(b) if:
(i)  the property:
(A)  is nonurban; and
(B)  does not and will not require a municipal service; and
(ii)  exclusion will not leave an unincorporated island within the proposed
town.
(d)  If the county legislative body excludes property from the area proposed
to be incorporated as a town, the county legislative body shall send written
notice of the exclusion to the contact sponsor within five days after the
exclusion.
(6)  Within 20 days after the filing of a petition under Subsection (4), the
county clerk shall:
(a)  with the assistance of other county officers from whom the clerk requests
assistance, determine whether the petition complies with the requirements of
Subsection (4); and
(b) (i)  if the clerk determines that the petition complies with those
requirements:
(A)  certify the petition and deliver the certified petition to the county
legislative body; and
(B)  mail or deliver written notification of the certification to:
(I)  the contact sponsor;
(II)  if applicable, the chair of the planning commission of each township in
which any part of the area proposed for incorporation is located; and
(III)  the Utah Population Estimates Committee; or
(ii)  if the clerk determines that the petition fails to comply with any of
those requirements, reject the petition and notify the contact sponsor in
writing of the rejection and the reasons for the rejection.
(7) (a) (i)  A petition that is rejected under Subsection (6)(b)(ii) may be
amended to correct a deficiency for which it was rejected and then refiled
with the county clerk.
(ii)  A valid signature on a petition filed under Subsection (4)(a) may be
used toward fulfilling the signature requirement of Subsection (4)(b) for the
same petition that is amended under Subsection (7)(a)(i) and then refiled with
the county clerk.
(b)  If a petition is amended and refiled under Subsection (7)(a)(i) after
having been rejected by the county clerk under Subsection (6)(b)(ii):
(i)  the amended petition shall be considered as a newly filed petition; and
(ii)  the amended petition's processing priority is determined by the date on
which it is refiled.
(8) (a) (i)  The legislative body of a county with which a petition is filed
under Subsection (4) may, at its option and upon the petition being certified
under Subsection (6), commission and pay for a financial feasibility study.
(ii)  If the county legislative body chooses to commission a financial
feasibility study, the county legislative body shall:
(A)  within 20 days after the incorporation petition is certified, select and
engage a feasibility consultant; and
(B)  require the feasibility consultant to complete the financial feasibility
study and submit written results of the study to the county legislative body
no later than 30 days after the feasibility consultant is engaged to conduct
the financial feasibility study.
(b)  The county legislative body shall approve a petition proposing the
incorporation of a town and hold an election for town officers, as provided in
Subsection (9), if:
(i)  the county clerk has certified the petition under Subsection (6); and
(ii) (A) (I)  the county legislative body has commissioned a financial
feasibility study under Subsection (8)(a); and
(II)  the results of the financial feasibility study show that the average
annual amount of revenues described in Subsection (1)(b)(i) does not exceed
the average annual amount of costs described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii) by more
than 10%; or
(B)  the county legislative body chooses not to commission a financial
feasibility study.
(c) (i)  If the county legislative body commissions a financial feasibility
study under Subsection (8)(a) and the results of the financial feasibility
study show that the average annual amount of revenues described in Subsection
(1)(b)(i) exceeds the average annual amount of costs described in Subsection
(1)(b)(ii) by more than 10%, the county legislative body may:
(A)  deny the petition, subject to Subsection (8)(c)(ii), if the results of
the financial feasibility study show that the average annual amount of
revenues described in Subsection (1)(b)(i) exceeds the average annual amount
of costs described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii) by 25% or more;
(B)  approve the petition and hold an election for town officers, as provided
in Subsection (9); or
(C) (I)  with the consent of the petition sponsors:
(Aa)  impose conditions to mitigate the fiscal inequities identified in the
financial feasibility study; or
(Bb)  alter the boundaries of the area proposed to be incorporated as a town
to approximate the boundaries necessary to prevent the average annual amount
of revenues described in Subsection (1)(b)(i) from exceeding the average
annual amount of costs described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii); and
(II)  approve the incorporation petition and hold an election for town
officers, as provided in Subsection (9).
(ii)  A county legislative body intending to deny a petition under Subsection
(8)(c)(i)(A) shall deny the petition within 20 days after the feasibility
consultant submits the written results of the financial feasibility study.
(d)  Each town that incorporates pursuant to a petition approved after the
county legislative body imposes conditions under Subsection (8)(c)(i)(C)(I)
shall comply with those conditions.
(9) (a)  The legislative body of the county in which the proposed new town is
located shall hold the election for town officers provided for in Subsection
(8) within:
(i)  45 days after the petition is certified, for an election under Subsection
(8)(b)(ii)(B);
(ii)  45 days after the feasibility consultant submits the written results of
the financial feasibility study, for an election under Subsection
(8)(b)(ii)(A) or (8)(c)(i)(B); or
(iii)  60 days after the feasibility consultant submits the written results of
the financial feasibility study, for an election under Subsection
(8)(c)(i)(C).
(b)  The officers elected at an election under Subsection (9)(a) shall take
office:
(i)  at noon on the first Monday in January next following the election, if
the election is held on a regular general or municipal general election date;
or
(ii)  at noon on the first day of the month next following the effective date
of the incorporation under Subsection (12), if the election of officers is
held on any other date.
(10)  Each newly incorporated town shall operate under the five-member council
form of government as defined in Section 10-3b-102.
(11)  The mayor-elect of the future town shall:
(a)  within 30 days after the canvass of the election of town officers under
Subsection (9), file with the lieutenant governor:
(i)  a copy of a notice of an impending boundary action, as defined in Section
67-1a-6.5, that meets the requirements of Subsection 67-1a-6.5(3); and
(ii)  a copy of an approved final local entity plat, as defined in Section
67-1a-6.5; and
(b)  upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of a certificate of incorporation
under Section 67-1a-6.5:
(i)  if the town is located within the boundary of a single county, submit to
the recorder of that county the original:
(A)  notice of an impending boundary action;
(B)  certificate of incorporation; and
(C)  approved final local entity plat; or
(ii)  if the town is located within the boundaries of more than a single
county, submit the original of the documents listed in Subsections
(11)(b)(i)(A), (B), and (C) to one of those counties and a certified copy of
those documents to each other county.
(12) (a)  A new town is incorporated:
(i)  on December 31 of the year in which the lieutenant governor issues a
certificate of incorporation under Section 67-1a-6.5, if the election of town
officers under Subsection (9) is held on a regular general or municipal
general election date; or
(ii)  on the last day of the month during which the lieutenant governor issues
a certificate of incorporation under Section 67-1a-6.5, if the election of
town officers under Subsection (9) is held on any other date.
(b) (i)  The effective date of an incorporation for purposes of assessing
property within the new town is governed by Section 59-2-305.5.
(ii)  Until the documents listed in Subsection (11)(b) are recorded in the
office of the recorder of each county in which the property is located, a
newly incorporated town may not:
(A)  levy or collect a property tax on property within the town;
(B)  levy or collect an assessment on property within the town; or
(C)  charge or collect a fee for service provided to property within the town.
(13)  For each petition filed before March 5, 2008:
(a)  the petition is subject to and governed by the law in effect at the time
the petition was filed; and
(b)  the law in effect at the time the petition was filed governs in all
administrative and judicial proceedings relating to the petition.
